Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 1
DRIVERS' LICENSES

Cross references:

For the short title of this part 1 ("Uniform Safety Code of 1935"), see § 42-4-101.

Law reviews:

For article, "There Must Be Fifty Ways to Lose Your (Driver's) License", see 22

Colo. Law. 2385

(1993).

42-2-101. Licenses for drivers required.

Except as otherwise provided in part 4 of this article for commercial drivers, no person shall drive any motor vehicle upon a highway in this state unless such person has been issued a currently valid driver's or minor driver's license or an instruction permit by the department under this article.

No person shall drive any motor vehicle upon a highway in this state if such person's driver's or minor driver's license has been expired for one year or less and such person has not been issued another such license by the department or by another state or country subsequent to such expiration.

No person shall drive any motor vehicle upon a highway in this state unless such person has in his or her immediate possession a current driver's or minor driver's license or an instruction permit issued by the department under this article.

No person who has been issued a currently valid driver's or minor driver's license or an instruction permit shall drive a type or general class of motor vehicle upon a highway in this state for which such person has not been issued the correct type or general class of license or permit.

No person who has been issued a currently valid driver's or minor driver's license or an instruction permit shall operate a motor vehicle upon a highway in this state without having such license or permit in such person's immediate possession.

A charge of a violation of subsection (2) of this section shall be dismissed by the court if the defendant elects not to pay the penalty assessment and, at or before the defendant's scheduled court appearance, exhibits to the court a currently valid driver's or minor driver's license.

A charge of a violation of subsection (5) of this section shall be dismissed by the court if the defendant elects not to pay the penalty assessment and, at or before the defendant's scheduled court appearance, exhibits to the court a currently valid license or permit issued to such person or an officially issued duplicate thereof if the original is lost, stolen, or destroyed.

The conduct of a driver of a motor vehicle which would otherwise constitute a violation of this section is justifiable and not unlawful when:

It is necessary as an emergency measure to avoid an imminent public or private injury which is about to occur by reason of a situation occasioned or developed through no conduct of said driver and which is of sufficient gravity that, according to ordinary standards of intelligence and morality, the desirability and urgency of avoiding the injury clearly outweigh the desirability of avoiding the injury sought to be prevented by this section; or

The applicable conditions for exemption, as set forth in section 42-2-102, exist.

The issue of justification or exemption is an affirmative defense. As used in this subsection (9), "affirmative defense" means that, unless the state's evidence raises the issue involving the particular defense, the defendant, to raise the issue, shall present some credible evidence on that issue. If the issue involved in an affirmative defense is raised, then the liability of the defendant must be established beyond a reasonable doubt as to that issue as well as all other elements of the traffic infraction.

Any person who violates any provision of subsection (1) or (4) of this section is guilty of a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense. Any person who violates any provision of subsection (2), (3), or (5) of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a second or subsequent conviction under subsection (1) or (4) of this section, when a person receiving such conviction has not subsequently obtained a valid Colorado driver's license or the correct type or general class of license, shall result in the assessment by the department of six points against the driving privilege of the person receiving such second or subsequent conviction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2114, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

(1) to (6) amended, p. 1349, § 14, effective July 1, 2001.

42-2-102. Persons exempt from license.

The following persons need not obtain a Colorado driver's license:

Any person who operates a federally owned military motor vehicle while serving in the armed forces of the United States;

Any person who temporarily drives or operates any road machine, farm tractor, or other implement of husbandry on a highway;

Any nonresident who is at least sixteen years of age and who has in his or her immediate possession a valid driver's license issued to such nonresident by his or her state or country of residence. A nonresident who is at least sixteen years of age and whose state or country of residence does not require the licensing of drivers may operate a motor vehicle as a driver for not more than ninety days in any calendar year, if said nonresident is the owner of the vehicle driven and if the motor vehicle so operated is duly registered in such nonresident's state or country of residence and such nonresident has in his or her immediate possession a registration card evidencing such ownership and registration in his or her own state or country.

A nonresident on active duty in the armed forces of the United States if that person has in his or her possession a valid driver's license issued by such nonresident's state of domicile or, if returning from duty outside the United States, has a valid driver's license in his or her possession issued by the armed forces of the United States in foreign countries, but such armed forces license shall be valid only for a period of forty-five days after the licensee has returned to the United States;

The spouse of a member of the armed forces of the United States who is accompanying such member on military or naval assignment to this state, who has a valid driver's license issued by another state, and whose right to drive has not been suspended or revoked in this state;

Any nonresident who is temporarily residing in Colorado for the principal purpose of furthering such nonresident's education, is at least sixteen years of age, has a valid driver's license from his or her state of residence, and is considered a nonresident for tuition purposes by the educational institution at which such nonresident is furthering his or her education.

Any person who has in his or her possession a valid driver's license issued by such person's previous state of residence shall be exempt, for thirty days after becoming a resident of the state of Colorado, from obtaining a license, as provided in section 42-2-101.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2115, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

42-2-103. Motorcycles - low-power scooters - driver's license required.

The department shall establish a motorcycle endorsement program for driver's licenses, minor driver's licenses, and instruction permits issued pursuant to this article.

The department shall require an applicant for a general motorcycle endorsement to demonstrate the applicant's ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable care and control in the operation of a motorcycle that is not an autocycle. The department shall also require an applicant for a limited three-wheel motorcycle endorsement to demonstrate the applicant's ability to exercise ordinary and reasonable care and control in the operation of a three-wheel motorcycle that is not an autocycle.

Except as provided in paragraph (e) of this subsection (1), a person shall not drive a two-wheel motorcycle on a roadway without a general motorcycle endorsement, but a person who possesses a general motorcycle endorsement may drive any motorcycle on the roadway.

Except as provided in subsection (1)(e) of this section, a person with only a limited three-wheel motorcycle endorsement may drive a three-wheel motorcycle that is not an autocycle but shall not drive a two-wheel motorcycle on a roadway.

The driver of a motorcycle need not obtain a two- or three-wheel motorcycle endorsement if the motorcycle is an autocycle or if the motorcycle has:

Three wheels;

A maximum design speed of twenty-five miles per hour or less;

A windshield; and

Seat belts.

An operator of a low-power scooter shall possess a valid driver's license or minor driver's license.

No low-power scooter shall be operated on any interstate system as described in section 43-2-101 (2), C.R.S., except where a bicycle may be operated on such interstate system, on any limited-access road of the state highway system as described in section 43-2-101 (1), C.R.S., or on any sidewalk, unless such operation is specifically designated. Low-power scooters may be operated upon roadways, except as provided in this section, and in bicycle lanes included within such roadways.

(2.5) An operator of an autocycle shall possess a valid driver's license or minor driver's license.

A person who operates a motorcycle in violation of subsection (1) of this section commits the offense of driving a motor vehicle without the correct class of license in violation of section 42-2-101 (4) and shall be punished as provided in section 42-2-101 (10).

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2116, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1349, § 15, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 79, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(2) amended, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1262, § 23, effective October 1.

L. 2015:

(1)(c) and (1)(d) amended and (1)(e) added, (HB 15-1345), ch. 330, p. 1346, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2017:

(1)(b), (1)(d), and IP(1)(e) amended and (2.5) added, (HB 17-1044), ch. 72, p. 229, § 2, effective March 23.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-2-102.5 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-2-103 was relocated to § 42-2-104.

42-2-104. Licenses issued - denied.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, the department may license the following persons in the manner prescribed in this article:

Any person twenty-one years of age or older, as a driver;

(Deleted by amendment,

L. 2000, p. 1348

, § 11, effective July 1, 2001.)

Any person sixteen years of age or older who has not reached his or her twenty-first birthday, as a minor driver.

(1.5) Repealed.

Except as otherwise provided in this article 2, the department shall not license a person to operate any motor vehicle in this state:

(Deleted by amendment,

L. 2007, p. 504

, § 2, effective July 1, 2007.)

While the person's privilege to drive is under restraint;

Who has been adjudged or determined by a court of competent jurisdiction to have a substance use disorder, as defined in section

27-81-102

, with respect to a controlled substance, as defined in section

18-18-102 (5)

;

Who has been adjudged or determined by a court of competent jurisdiction to be afflicted with or suffering from any mental disability or disease and who has not at the time of application been restored to competency in the manner prescribed by law.

The department shall not issue a license to:

Any person required by this article to take an examination until such person has successfully passed the examination;

Any person required under the provisions of any motor vehicle financial safety or responsibility law to deposit or furnish proof of financial responsibility until such person has deposited or furnished such proof;

Any person whose license is subject to suspension or revocation or who does not have a license but would be subject to suspension or revocation pursuant to section 42-2-125, 42-2-126, or 42-2-127;

Any person not submitting proof of age or proof of identity, or both, as required by the department;

A person whose presence in the United States is in violation of federal immigration laws;

A person who, while under the age of sixteen, was convicted of any offense that would have subjected the person to a revocation of driving privileges under section 42-2-125 for the period of such revocation if such person had possessed a driver's license.

The department shall not issue a driver's license, including, without limitation, a temporary driver's license under section 42-2-106 (2), to a person under eighteen years of age unless the person has:

Applied for, been issued, and possessed an appropriate instruction permit for at least twelve months; and

Submitted a log or other written evidence on a standardized form approved by the department certifying that the person has completed not less than fifty hours of actual driving experience, of which not less than ten hours shall have been completed while driving at night, which form is signed by:

The person who signed the affidavit of liability;

The instructor of a driver's education course approved by the department; or

Any individual who is twenty-one years of age or older, who holds a valid driver's license, and who instructed the applicant if the applicant is a foster child.

In no event shall the department issue a minor driver's license to anyone under sixteen years of age.

The department shall not issue a driver's license to a person under sixteen years and six months of age unless the person has either:

Received a minimum of twelve hours of driving-behind-the-wheel training directed by a parent, a legal guardian, or an alternate permit supervisor, which training shall be in addition to the driving experience required by subsection (4) of this section, if no entity offers approved behind-the-wheel driver training at least twenty hours a week from a permanent location with an address that is within thirty miles of the permit holder's residence; or

Received a minimum of six hours of driving-behind-the-wheel training with a driving instructor employed or associated with an approved driver education course.

The department shall not issue a driver's license, minor driver's license, or instruction permit to an individual whose authorization to be present in the United States is temporary unless the individual applies under and complies with part 5 of this article.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2116, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 97:

(3)(f) amended, p. 1537, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(3)(f) amended, p. 392, § 3, effective July 1; (4) amended, p. 1379, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1) amended and (1.5) added, p. 1348, § 11, effective July 1, 2001.

L. 2003:

(3)(f) amended, p. 1904, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

IP(4)(a) and (4)(a)(I) amended, p. 1264, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(3)(f) amended, p. 640, § 2, effective May 27.

L. 2006:

IP(4)(a) and (4)(a)(II) amended, p. 733, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(5) added, p. 588, § 2, effective April 20; IP(2), (2)(a), and (2)(b) amended and (2)(b.5) added, p. 504, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

IP(4)(a), (4)(a)(II), and (5) amended, (SB 10-015), ch. 60, p. 217, § 1, effective August 11.

L. 2012:

(2)(c) amended, (HB 12-1311), ch. 281, p. 1631, § 87, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

IP(3) and (3)(e) amended and (6) added, (SB 13-251), ch. 402, p. 2351, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2017:

IP(2) and (2)(c) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1380, § 305, effective May 25.

L. 2019:

(4)(a) amended, (HB 19-1023), ch. 239, p. 2364, § 3, effective August 2.

L. 2020:

(2)(c) amended, (SB 20-007), ch. 286, p. 1417, § 55, effective July 13.

42-2-105. Special restrictions on certain drivers.

A person under the age of eighteen years shall not drive any motor vehicle used to transport explosives or inflammable material or any motor vehicle used as a school vehicle for the transportation of pupils to or from school. A person under the age of eighteen years shall not drive a motor vehicle used as a commercial, private, or common carrier of persons or property unless such person has experience in operating motor vehicles and has been examined on such person's qualifications in operating such vehicles. The examination shall include safety regulations of commodity hauling, and the driver shall be licensed as a driver or a minor driver who is eighteen years of age or older.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, no person under the age of twenty-one years shall drive a commercial motor vehicle as defined in section 42-2-402 (4) except as provided in section 42-2-404 (4).

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2117, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 1355, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 1034, § 73, effective June 1.

L. 2010:

(1) amended, (HB 10-1232), ch. 163, p. 572, § 11, effective April 28.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-2-104 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-2-105 was relocated to § 42-2-106.

Cross references:

For the penalty for a class A traffic infraction, see § 42-4-1701 (3).

42-2-105.5. Restrictions on minor drivers under eighteen years of age - penalties - legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds, determines, and declares that:

Teenage drivers, in order to become safe and responsible drivers, need behind-the-wheel driving experience before they can begin to drive without restrictions;

Providing additional behind-the-wheel training with a parent, guardian, or other responsible adult before obtaining a minor driver's license is the beginning of the young driver's accumulation of experience;

Once a teenage driver begins to drive without a parent, guardian, or other responsible adult in the vehicle, it is necessary to place restrictions on a teenage driver who holds a minor driver's license until such driver turns eighteen years of age in order to give that driver time to exercise good judgment in the operation of a vehicle while keeping that driver, his or her passengers, and the public safe;

Penalties for the violation of these restrictions on minor drivers under eighteen years of age, including the assessment of points where they may not otherwise be assessed, should be sufficient to ensure that chronic violations would result in swift and severe repercussions to reinforce the importance of obeying the driving laws in order to keep the minor driver, his or her passengers, and the public safe.

Repealed.

Occupants in motor vehicles driven by persons under eighteen years of age shall be properly restrained or wear seat belts as required in sections 42-4-236 and 42-4-237.

No more than one passenger shall occupy the front seat of the motor vehicle driven by a person under eighteen years of age, and the number of passengers in the back seat of such vehicle shall not exceed the number of seat belts.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (5), any person who violates this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

A violation of subsection (3) of this section is a traffic infraction, and, notwithstanding the provisions of section 42-4-1701 (4)(a)(I)(D), a person convicted of violating subsection (3) of this section shall be punished as follows:

By the imposition of not less than eight hours nor more than twenty-four hours of community service for a first offense and not less than sixteen hours nor more than forty hours of community service for a subsequent offense;

By the levying of a fine of not more than sixty-five dollars for a first offense, a fine of not more than one hundred thirty dollars for a second offense, and a fine of one hundred ninety-five dollars for a subsequent offense; and

By an assessment of two license suspension points pursuant to section 42-2-127 (5)(hh).

Source:

L. 99:

Entire section added, p. 1379, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(2) repealed, p. 334, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1)(c), (1)(d), (3), (4), and (5) amended, p. 438, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(5)(b)(II) amended, p. 2086, § 3, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1999 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 334, Session Laws of Colorado 1999.